Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.095

Registration at more than one community and technical college.

In addition to other powers and duties, the college board may issue rules and regulations permitting a student to register at more than one community and technical college, provided that such student shall pay tuition and fees as if the student were registered at a single college, but not to exceed tuition and fees charged a full-time student as established under chapter 28B.15 RCW.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 11; 1991 c 238 s 36; 1983 c 3 s 40; 1973 c 129 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Purpose—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.